Washington statutes.
RCW 6.25.100

Action on bond—Damages and attorney's fees.

In an action on such bond, if it is shown that the attachment was wrongfully sued out, the defendant may recover the actual damages sustained and reasonable attorney's fees to be fixed by the court. If it is shown that such attachment was sued out maliciously, the defendant may recover exemplary damages, and the defendant need not wait until the principal suit is determined before suing on the bond.

[ 1987 c 442 s 810; 1886 p 41 s 8; RRS s 654. Prior: Code 1881 ss 174-192; 1877 pp 35-40; 1873 pp 43-50; 1871 pp 9, 10; 1869 pp 41-47; 1863 pp 112-120; 1860 pp 30-36; 1854 pp 155-162. Formerly RCW 7.12.080.]